District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-309.02

Terms and qualifications of members.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 902, 32 DCR 7396
Oct. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 7-31, § 2, 34 DCR 3789
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(bb), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1189.2.